Utah statutes.
53-2a-507.   Legislative findings -- Comity with Idaho.

(1)  The Legislature finds, with regard to emergency responders, that:

(a)  Title 6, Chapter 9, of the Idaho Code, regarding the governmental immunity laws of Idaho, is consistent with the public policy of Utah; and

(b)  based on the legislative finding under Subsection (1)(a), the governmental immunity laws of Idaho apply to any claim, including any lawsuit, brought against an emergency responder, who resides in or is employed as an emergency responder in Idaho, and the emergency responder's employer, based on the emergency responder's actions in Utah when acting as an emergency responder.

(2)  The Legislature finds:

(a)  the damage caps in the governmental immunity laws of Idaho, although not identical to the damage caps under Section 63G-7-604, Utah Code Annotated, are consistent with the public policy of Utah; and

(b)  the damage caps of Idaho apply to any claim, including any lawsuit, brought against an emergency responder, who resides in or is employed as an emergency responder in Idaho, and the emergency responder's employer, based on the emergency responder's actions in Utah when acting as an emergency responder.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

